test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-veqzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - veʼž: # Noun 88 'eng /est vesi/fin' - full paradigm
     veʼž+N+Sg+Nom: [veʼž, vež]
     veʼž+N+Sg+Gen: [vieʼd, vied]
     veʼž+N+Sg+Par: vietā
     veʼž+N+Sg+Dat: [vieʼddõn, vieddõn]
     veʼž+N+Sg+Ins: [vieʼdkõks, viedkõks]
     veʼž+N+Sg+Ill: [vieʼddõ, vieddõ]
     veʼž+N+Sg+Ela: [vieʼdstõ, viedstõ]
     veʼž+N+Pl+Nom: viedūd
     veʼž+N+Pl+Gen: viedūd
     veʼž+N+Pl+Par: [veʼžži, vežži]
     veʼž+N+Pl+Dat: viedūdõn
     veʼž+N+Pl+Ins: viedūdõks
     veʼž+N+Pl+Ill: vežīz
     veʼž+N+Pl+Ela: vežīst
